Utah statutes.
11-13-224.   Utah interlocal entity for alternative fuel vehicles and facilities.

(1)  As used in this section, "commission" means the Public Service Commission of Utah, established in Section 54-1-1.

(2)  The governing body of a Utah interlocal entity created to facilitate the conversion to alternative fuel vehicles or to facilitate the construction, operation, and maintenance of facilities for alternative fuel vehicles, or both, shall consist of:

(a)  an individual from the executive branch of state government, appointed by the governor;

(b)  a member of the Senate, appointed by the president of the Senate;

(c)  a member of the House of Representatives, appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives;

(d)  an individual from the Utah Association of Counties, appointed by the president of the Senate;

(e)  an individual from the Utah League of Cities and Towns, appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives;

(f)  an individual employed by a school district in the state, appointed by the governor;

(g)  an individual appointed by the public transit district under Title 17B, Chapter 2a, Part 8, Public Transit District Act, with the largest budget of all public transit districts in the state;

(h)  an individual employed by a gas corporation in the state, appointed by the governor; and

(i)  a representative of the Utah Petroleum Marketers and Retailers Association, appointed by the governor.

(3)  A Utah interlocal entity described in Subsection (2):

(a)  may contribute toward the funding required for the construction, operation, and maintenance of facilities for alternative fuel vehicles that are used by or benefit the interlocal entity; and

(b)  shall participate with the commission in proceedings the commission conducts under Section 54-1-13.



Enacted by Chapter 311, 2013 General Session

